Utah statutes.
10-3-1006.   Rules and regulations -- Printing and distribution.
The civil service commission shall make all necessary rules and regulations to
carry out the purposes of this part and for examinations, appointments and
promotions. All rules and regulations shall be printed by the civil service
commission for distribution.
